Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 3. Calculation of Royalties on Oil, Natural Gas and AssociatedNatural Resource Production

§ 36-6-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Associated natural resource” means any substance, element or compound, either gaseous, liquid or solid, associated with the production, refining or processing of oil or gas. The term includes, but is not limited to, propane, butanes, ethane, methane, carbon dioxide, sulphur, helium, nitrogen and natural gas liquids;

“Natural gas” means hydrocarbons or nonhydrocarbons which at atmospheric conditions of temperature and pressure are in a gaseous phase;

“Oil” means crude petroleum and other hydrocarbons regardless of gravity which are produced at the wellhead in liquid form, and the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas, other than gas produced in association with oil and commonly known as casinghead gas;

“Processing plant” means a plant to remove liquefiable hydrocarbons from a gas stream or to separate natural gas into physically or chemically distinct marketable associated natural resources;

“Return on investment” means a percentage rate applied over a period of years to the equity investment for construction of transportation facilities or processing plants for oil, natural gas or associated natural resources. This percentage rate represents the rate a lessee or successor in interest supposedly could have received from investment of equity in some other commercial or financial undertaking. “Return on investment” also means a percentage of earnings or profitability ratio which a lessee, producer or successor in interest anticipates or desires to receive on the equity investment in transportation facilities or processing plant;

“Transportation facilities” means those facilities constructed for moving any oil, natural gas or associated natural resource from the place of production to the closest point of sale or to a processing plant.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 94, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Royalties due to state on tax reimbursements. —

Under a “federal floor” provision in state natural gas leases, under which the state was entitled to receive the same royalty revenues that the federal government received from its leases in the same field, if other gas producers in the same field remitted royalties to the federal government and calculated on the basis of the Natural Gas Policy Act, 15 USCS § 3301 et seq., ceiling price plus tax reimbursements, state lease gas producers were required to calculate their state royalty payments on the same basis. Cities Serv. Oil & Gas Corp. v. State, 838 P.2d 146,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1992).

The state was entitled to receive royalties on tax reimbursements for ad valorem, severance and conservation taxes under an “amount realized” provision set forth in natural gas leases entered into with a private corporation. Tax reimbursements were part of the “amount” that the corporation “realized” from the sale of the natural gas and the state's royalty was properly calculated under the basis of inclusion of the tax reimbursement amount in addition to the price received for the gas sold. Cities Serv. Oil & Gas Corp. v. State, 838 P.2d 146,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 36-6-302.
“Return on investment” deduction not allowed for calculation of royalty.

For state lease royalty and overriding royalty, other than royalty owing to the United States of America, calculations for oil, natural gas and associated natural resources, neither lessee nor any successor in interest will be allowed any deduction for any “return on investment cost.”

This article applies to all state leases of oil, natural gas or associated natural resources.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 94, § 1.